District of Columbia statutes.
7-1202.03

Redisclosure.

Mental health information disclosed pursuant to this subchapter cannot be further disclosed by the recipient without authorization as provided in § 7-1202.01.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 203, 25 DCR 5055
1981 Ed., § 6-2013.
1973 Ed., § 6-1617.